Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.074

Compensation for loss of or damage to clothing or footwear.

Victims otherwise eligible for compensation under this chapter may also claim compensation for loss of or damage to the victim's personal clothing or footwear incurred in the course of emergency medical treatment for injuries.

[ 2011 c 346 s 406.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.